Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
CONVERSIONS, MERGERS, CONSOLIDATIONS, ACQUISITIONS,

ASSUMPTIONS,
AND VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTIONS

§412:3-600 Applicability of this part.
This part applies to:

(1) The conversion, merger, consolidation,
acquisition of assets or assumption of liabilities or deposits, acquisition of
control, voluntary cessation of business, or voluntary dissolution involving a
Hawaii financial institution;

(2) The merger, consolidation, or acquisition of
control of a financial institution holding company which controls:

(A) A Hawaii financial institution; and

(B) To the extent permitted by federal law, a
federal financial institution whose operations are principally conducted in
this State; and

(3) All persons who seek to merge or consolidate
with, acquire the assets or assume the liabilities of, or acquire control of:

(A) A Hawaii financial institution;

(B) A financial institution holding company
which controls a Hawaii financial institution; and

(C) To the extent permitted by federal law, a
financial institution holding company which controls a federal financial
institution whose operations are principally conducted in this State. [L 1993,
c 350, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 107, §10; am L 1998, c 39, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next